src/phonology/vro-phon.twolc
"%{uv%}:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{uv%}:v <=> u _ %> v a q ;
         u _ [ %{dv%}:|%{gv%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ ju%{uv%}%{dv%}%^WGStem%>a
!!€ juvv0%>a
         [o|õ] _ [ %{dd́v%}:|%{gǵv%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!! joudma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ jõ%{uv%}%{dd́v%}back%^WGStem%>i
!!€ jõvv00%>i

"%{üv%}:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{üv%}:v <=> ü _ (HarmDummies:) %> v ä q ;
         ü _ [%{dv%}: | %{dd́v%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ pü%{üv%}%{dd́v%}%^WGStem%>et
!!€ püvv0%>et
!!€ sü%{üv%}%{dv%}%^WGStem%>ä
!!€ süvv0%>ä
         ö _ [ %{dd́v%}:|%{gǵv%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;

"%^I7:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %^I7:i <=> Vow _ Vow (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem:  ;
!!€ va%^I7o%^StrGStem%>i
!!€ vaio0%>0

!FIXME 2019-05-8
!"%^V7:v with 0:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
! %^V7:v <=> Vow _ 0: Vow (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem:  ;
!!€ hä%^V70ö%^StrGStem
!!€ hävvü0

!! CONSONANT
"%{pṕØ%}:ṕ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{pṕØ%}:ṕ <=>
 p _ (HarmDummies:) [%^G2:|%^StrGStem:] %^PAL: ;
!!€ pap%{pṕØ%}%{back%}%^G2%^PAL
!!€ papṕ000

"%{tt́Ø%}:t́ "
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{tt́Ø%}:t́ <=>
 [t|h] _ (HarmDummies:) [%^G2:|%^StrGStem:] %^PAL: ;
!!täht́+N+Sg+Nom:
!!€ täh%{tt́Ø%}
!!€ täht́

"%{kḱØ%}:ḱ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{kḱØ%}:ḱ <=>
 k _ (HarmDummies:) [%^G2:|%^StrGStem:] %^PAL: ;



!! SECONDARY CONSONANT LENGTHENING


!CHECKME 2020-02-13
"%{Øp%}:p"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!! {{{
 %{Øp%}:p <=> Vow: _ [%{pbØ%}:|%{pb%}:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^XStrGStem: ;
!!€ hä%{Øp%}%{pbØ%}ü%^Pen%^XStrGStem
!!€ häppü00
   Vow: _ [%{pbv%}:|%{pb%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^XStrGStem: ;
!!tõbi+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ tõ%{Øp%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^XStrGStem%>%{eõ%}
!!€ tõpp00%>õ
!! }}}

"%{Øt%}:t"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{Øt%}:t <=> Vow _ [%{tdØ%}:|%{td%}:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^XStrGStem: ;
!!€ sõ%{Øt%}da%^XStrGStem%^PLPRT
!!€ sõtto00
!?? _ t Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!!€ ü%{Øt%}te%^Pen%^StrGStem
!!€ ütte00


"%{Øk%}:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{Øk%}:k <=> Vow _ [%{kgØ%}:|%{kg%}:|g:] (HarmDummies: | [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen:) %^XStrGStem: ;
!!€ ig0ä %^Pen%^XStrGStem
!!€ ikkä0
!??   Vow k _ Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!!€ mak0õ%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>i%>dõ
!!€ makkõ00%>i%>dõ
   Vow: _ [%{kgØ%}:|%{kg%}:] (HarmDummies:) %^XStrGStem: ;
!!mägi+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ mä%{Øk%}%{kgØ%}%{front%}%^XStrGStem%>%{eõ%}
!!€ mäkk00%>e


"%{XC%}:s"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XC%}:s <=> [ s: | %{sś%}:s ] (HarmDummies:) ((%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ) _ ;

"%{XC%}:l"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XC%}:l <=> l: (HarmDummies:) _  %^NoPAL:  ;

"%{XC%}:ĺ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XC%}:ĺ <=> l: (HarmDummies:) _ %^PAL: ;

"%{XC%}:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XC%}:k <=> [%{kg%}:k | k: ] (HarmDummies:) _ ;

"%{kḱ%}:ḱ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{kḱ%}:ḱ <=> %{kØ%}:k  (HarmDummies:) _ Vow:0 %^VowRM: %^PAL: ;
 _ [(HarmDummies:) (%^VOWRaise:) (%^CC2C: | %^WGStem: |%^StrGStem: ) %^PAL:| (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) [%^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem: ] %^PAL:| Vow: Cns:* (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^PAL:] ;
!! kakma
!!€ ka%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}u%^VowRM%^PAL
!!€ kakḱ000


!! !Consonant weakening 

! aika: ajan
"kToZero"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
k:0 <=>
  [h|k|s] _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (s) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ puhkas%^WGStem%>taq
!!€ puh0as0%>taq

 s _ a (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
! [  #  Cns* Vow (( r | i | VowNonHigh ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vow :Cns+ :Vow+ k ] _ [ GRC | %^D2S:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
![ [ # ] Cns* Vow (( r | i ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vow :Cns+ :Vow+ k ] _ [ [Vow:|ArchVow:] | :Vow | ( Vow ) %> i ] ( %> i: | %^StretchSyll2:0 ) %> %^WCns:0 ;
!        [ # ] Cns* VowBack i: _ [ GRC | %^D2S:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
  k _ [(HarmDummies:)|[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen:] [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: ] ;
  [h|s] _ [(HarmDummies:)|[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen:] %^WGStem:  ;
!!€ ikkõ%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}
!!€ ik000000%>ma

"%{pṕØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{pṕØ%}:0 <=>
 p _ (HarmDummies:) ( %^VOWLower: ) [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;

"%{tt́Ø%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{tt́Ø%}:0 <=>
  [t|h] _ (HarmDummies:) ( %^VOWLower: ) [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;

"%{kḱØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{kḱØ%}:0 <=>
 [k|h|s] _ (HarmDummies:) ( %^VOWLower: ) [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;

!!juuskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:
!!€ j{ou}{ou}s{kḱØ}{back}^VOWLower^WGStem>{eõ}
!!€ joos0000>õ
!!$ j{ou}{ou}s{kḱØ}{back}^VOWLower^WGStem>{eõ}
!!$ joosk000>õ

"%{sØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{sØ%}:0 <=>  _ [s|ś] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:|ArchCns:) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:  [%^G1:|%^G2:|%^WGStem:] ;
!!€ su%{sØ%}śo%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ su0śo00
    _  (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) (%^Pen:  %^G1:|%^Pen:  %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem: ) %^WGStem: ;
!!hammas+N+Sg+Gen: __tooth/hammas__
!!€ ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem
!!€ hamba000000


"%{rØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{rØ%}:0 <=>  _ [r|ŕ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: |%^WGStem:];
!!€ a%{rØ%}ro%^Pen%^G2
!!€ a0ro00
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [r|ŕ ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) (%^Pen: %^G1: |%^Pen: %^WGStem:) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [r|ŕ ] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [r|ŕ | ArchCns: ] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [r|ŕ] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;


"%{nØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{nØ%}:0 <=>  _ [n|ń] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
!!€ su%{nØ%}ńo%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ su0ńo00

 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [n|ń ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:| ArchCns: |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [%^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:| ArchCns: |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [ %^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) (%^Pen: %^G1: |%^Pen: %^WGStem:) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [n|ń ] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) %^Pen: [ %^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [n|ń | ArchCns: ] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) [%^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [n|ń] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [ %^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:]  ;


"%{lØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{lØ%}:0 <=>  _ l [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
!!€ ta%{lØ%}lo%^Pen%^G2
!!€ ta0lo00
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [l|ĺ ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) (%^Pen: %^G1:|%^Pen: %^WGStem: ) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [l|ĺ ] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [l|ĺ | ArchCns: ] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [l|ĺ] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;


"%{mØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{mØ%}:0 <=>  _ m [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2:|%^WGStem:] ;
!!€ su%{sØ%}śo%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ su0śo00
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [m|ḿ ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) (%^Pen: %^G1:|%^Pen: %^WGStem: ) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [m|ḿ ] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower: | %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [m|ḿ | ArchCns: ] (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [m|ḿ] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;


"%{kØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{kØ%}:0 <=> [h|s] _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (s|%{sØ%}:|ArchCns: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ puhkas%^WGStem%>taq
!!€ puh0as0%>taq
 [s|h] _  (HarmDummies:) ( %^VOWLower:) %^WGStem: ;
!! nätsk+A+Sg+Gen
!!€ nä%{td%}s%{kØ%}%{front%}%^G1%>%{aä%}
!!€ näds000%>ä

!  k _ (HarmDummies:) (%^VOWLower:) [ %^G1: | %^G2: ] ;
 s _ a (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) %^Pen: [%^WGStem:] ;
 
   _ [k | ḱ ] (HarmDummies:) [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: ] ;
   _ [k | ḱ ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] ( %{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen: [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem:] ;
   _ [ %{kḱ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: |%^G3: ] ;
   _ [ %{kḱ%}: ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] ( %{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummies:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:) %^Pen: [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: | %^G3: ] ;

   _ [ %{kg%}: ] (HarmDummies:) [%^G2:]  ;
  [h|s] _ [(HarmDummies:)|[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen:] [%^WGStem:]  ;
!!€ i%{kØ%}kõ%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}
!!€ i0k00000%>ma
 
!! kakma:
!!€ ka%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}u%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}
!!€ ka0k00000%>ma
  _ %{kḱg%}: (HarmDummies:) [ %^CC2C: | %^G2: | %^G3: ] ;

!! kõiḱ+Pron+Sg+Nom
!!€ kõi%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}%^CC2C%^PAL
!!€ kõi0ḱ00
 Vow  _ [ k | ḱ ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (ArchCns:) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen:  %^WGStem:  ;
 Vow  _ [ %{kgØ%}: ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (ArchCns:) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [%^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3: ] ;
!!€ ri%{kØ%}ka%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ ri0kas00000
 Vow  _  %{kgØ%}:  (HarmDummies:)  [%^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3: ] ;

  _ %{kg%}: (HarmDummies:) [ %^G2: | %^G3: ] ;

"pToZero"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 p:0 <=>
  p _ (HarmDummies:) [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
  p _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
!!€ tapp%{back%}%^CC2C%>m%{aä%}
!!€ tap000%>ma

"%{pØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{pØ%}:0 <=>
  _ p (HarmDummies:) [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:| %^G1: ] ;
!  _ p (HarmDummies:) [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:| %^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3:] ;
  _ p [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns|%{ij%}:|%{sØ%}:) (HarmDummies:) ( %^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;!2019-11-05
!  _ p [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3: | %^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;!2019-11-05
  p _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) ( %^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^CC2C:0] ;
!!€ tap%{pØ%}%{back%}%^CC2C%>m%{aä%}
!!€ tap000%>ma
Vow: _ [ %{pbØ%}: | %{pbv%}: ] Vow: (HarmDummies:) ( %^Pen: %^VOWLower: |%^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ) %^Pen: [ %^G1: |%^G2: | %^G3: ] ;
Vow: _  %{pbv%}: (HarmDummies:) [ %^G1: |%^G2: | %^G3: ] ;
